Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.075

Local government regulation and policy handouts—Technical assistance.

The department shall provide technical assistance in the compilation of and support in the production of the handouts to be published and kept current by counties and cities under RCW 36.70B.220.

[ 1996 c 206 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—1996 c 206: See note following RCW 43.05.030.